Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

174.990.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully hauls, transports, or causes to be transported any hazardous material into, out of, within, or through the Commonwealth in violation of the provisions of KRS

174.400

to

174.425

, or contrary to an order, or regulation issued or promulgated under KRS

174.400

to

174.425

, shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), for each day of violation.

Any person who operates a vehicle which transports municipal solid waste in violation of KRS

174.450

and administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet pursuant to KRS

174.450

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of violation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 384, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 99, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.